Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 2

Miscellaneous Licenses and Permits

70-2-201. Resident license fees and requirements.

Every resident, except as otherwise provided, shall pay in accordance with the following fee schedule for the privilege of hunting, sport fishing, or trapping; provided, that no license shall be required for trapping beaver:

Basic licenses:

Combination hunting and fishing $20.00

Junior hunting, fishing and trapping 7.00

Trapping 17.00

One (1) day fishing 2.00

County of residence fishing 5.00

Sportsman 100.00

Supplemental licenses:

Big game — gun $17.00

Big game — archery 17.00

Big game — muzzleloader 17.00

Waterfowl 17.00

Trout 11.00

Duplicate license 4.00

Every resident shall provide the correct information specified on all licenses and permits. All licenses and permits must be filled out in ink, indelible pencil, typewriter, or punched or stamped, or otherwise marked to prevent erasures, false entries or alterations and must be signed in ink or indelible pencil by the licensee.

Residents of Tennessee who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older prior to March 1, 1991, are entitled to the privileges of sport fishing, hunting and trapping without possessing any license.

Residents of Tennessee who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older after March 1, 1991, are entitled to the privileges of sport fishing, hunting and trapping upon payment of a one-time ten-dollar ($10.00) fee. Upon payment of such fee and presentation of proof of age and residency, satisfactory to the agency, such resident shall be issued a permanent license for sport fishing, hunting and trapping.

Any resident of Tennessee between thirteen (13) and fifteen (15) years of age, inclusive, may purchase the junior hunting, fishing and trapping license. Such license shall entitle the individual to the privileges of sport fishing, trapping and hunting without the requirement of possessing any other license or supplemental license as provided in subsection (a). Any resident under thirteen (13) years of age shall be exempt from the licensing requirements of subsection (a). Residents between thirteen (13) and fifteen (15) years of age, inclusive, are entitled to fish without a license during one (1) week of the year, commencing with free sport fishing day as proclaimed by the fish and wildlife commission.

A sportsman license is valid for hunting, trapping and sport fishing without the necessity of any supplemental license. Additionally, a holder of a valid sportsman license is not required to possess the following agency permits: agency lake permits; Tellico-Citico trout permits; Lake Graham annual permits; small game permits; combination waterfowl and small game permits; nonquota big game, including Cherokee, permits; Reelfoot preservation permits; and premiere tourist resort city trout fishing permits. The holder may also participate in all quota hunt drawings without payment of the drawing fee, and if drawn, will be issued a quota hunt permit at no charge. Furthermore, for as long as Tennessee Wildlife is published, the executive director shall have the discretion to provide a subscription to a sportsman license holder at no cost.

A combination hunting and fishing license is valid for the taking of all species of game and fish; provided, that those persons sixteen (16) years of age and over desiring to hunt big game, waterfowl, or to take trout, must, in addition to the appropriate hunting or fishing licenses, or both, possess the appropriate supplemental license as provided in subsection (a).

There is hereby created a lifetime sportsman license, which shall entitle a resident of Tennessee, as defined in subdivision (g)(2), to the same privileges and benefits as provided to an annual sportsman license holder. A lifetime sportsman license remains valid throughout the life of the license holder even though the person may become a nonresident.

In order to qualify for a lifetime sportsman license, a person must have been a resident of the state for twelve (12) consecutive months immediately preceding purchase of the license. A child under the age of one (1) year qualifies, no matter where the child is born, if one (1) or more of the child's parents or the child's legally designated guardian has been a resident of the state for twelve (12) consecutive months immediately preceding purchase of the license.

The following fee schedule applies to the lifetime sportsman license:

Less than three (3) years of age $ 200.00

Three (3) years of age through six (6) years of age $ 400.00

Seven (7) years of age through twelve (12) years of age $ 600.00

Thirteen (13) years of age through fifty (50) years of age $1,200.00

Fifty-one (51) years of age through sixty-four (64) years of age $ 700.00

Sixty-five (65) years of age and older $ 200.00

The fees are automatically adjusted to reflect the same percentage increase as the annual sportsman license. No fees may be decreased as part of the automatic adjustment.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 10 (Williams, § 5178.39); Acts 1955, ch. 152, §§ 2-4; 1957, ch. 221, § 1; 1959, ch. 173, § 1; 1961, ch. 196, § 1; 1961, ch. 197, § 1; 1965, ch. 106, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 140, § 1; 1965, ch. 249, § 1; 1965, ch. 338, § 1; 1967, ch. 154, § 1; 1967, ch. 314, § 1; 1969, ch. 222, § 1; 1970, ch. 406, § 1; 1972, ch. 650, § 1; 1972, ch. 819, § 1; 1972, ch. 820, § 1; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1975, ch. 241, § 1; 1976, ch. 624, § 1; 1976, ch. 627, § 1; 1976, ch. 682, § 1; 1978, ch. 783, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 180, § 1; 1981, ch. 83, § 5; 1981, ch. 514, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-203; Acts 1983, ch. 285, § 2; 1985, ch. 350, § 8; 1989, ch. 486, §§ 2-4; 1990, ch. 987, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 204, § 1; 1998, ch. 610, § 1; 2001, ch. 376, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 319, § 1; 2003, ch. 360, § 1; 2004, ch. 503, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13; 2020, ch. 807, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (g)(3)(B), substituted “are” for “shall be” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence which read: “Such fee increases and subsequent adjustments shall not apply to lifetime sportsman licenses purchased for children less than three (3) years of age.”, and rewrote the last sentence which read: “In no event shall the fees decrease.”; and deleted former (h) which read: “There is hereby created a lifetime senior citizen sportsman license, which shall entitle a resident of Tennessee to the same privileges and benefits as provided to an annual sportsman license holder. A lifetime senior citizen sportsman license remains valid throughout the life of the license holder even though the person may become a nonresident. The fee shall be a one-time payment of two hundred dollars ($200).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 807, § 3. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Fees and penalties not to be established by rule or regulation, § 70-1-102.

Free licenses to blind persons, § 70-2-104.

Free licenses to disabled veterans, § 70-2-104.

Hunting and fishing permits in addition to licenses for designated areas under control of wildlife resources agency, § 70-2-219.

Reelfoot preservation permit, § 70-2-219.

Attorney General Opinions. Felon or domestic violence offender obtaining a Tennessee hunting license; restrictions on type of weapon used for hunting; ability to supervise juvenile who is hunting. OAG 10-21, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/24/10).

Licenses to hunt and possession of firearms and effect of conviction of certain felonies and other offenses. OAG 15-33, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (4/10/15).

70-2-202. Nonresident license fees and requirements. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Every nonresident shall pay, in accordance with the following fee schedule, for the privilege of hunting, sport fishing, or trapping:

Nonresident annual hunting, sport fishing and trapping:

Hunting:

Small game and waterfowl $ 55.00

All game 155.00

Fishing, except trout 25.00

Fishing, all species 50.00

Trapping 250.00

Junior hunting and fishing 5.00

No license is required for trapping beaver.

Every nonresident shall pay in accordance with the following fee schedule for the privilege of trip hunting and sport fishing:

Hunting:

Seven (7) day small game and waterfowl $ 30.00

Seven (7) day all game 105.00

Fishing:

Three (3) day, except trout 10.00

Three (3) day, all species 20.00

Ten (10) day, except trout 15.00

Ten (10) day, all species 30.00

Every nonresident shall provide the correct information specified on all licenses and permits. All licenses and permits must be filled out in ink, indelible pencil, typewriter, or punched or stamped, or otherwise marked to prevent erasures, false entries or alterations and must be signed in ink or indelible pencil by the licensee.

Any nonresident between thirteen (13) years of age and fifteen (15) years of age, inclusive, may purchase a junior hunting and fishing license. Such license entitles the individual to the privilege of sport fishing and small game and waterfowl hunting. Any nonresident under thirteen (13) years of age is exempt from the licensing requirements of subsection (a).

Acts 1981, ch. 83, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 699, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 51-204; Acts 1985, ch. 101, § 1; 1985, ch. 249, § 1; 1989, ch. 486, §§ 5, 6; 1992, ch. 616, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Attorney General Opinions. Licenses to hunt and possession of firearms and effect of conviction of certain felonies and other offenses. OAG 15-33, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (4/10/15).

70-2-203. Fishing in county or city of residence — When license required — Penalty.

A resident of Tennessee may fish in the waters of such person's county of legal residence by use of a hook and line or a single trotline with not more than fifty (50) hooks, and natural or cut bait if such person possesses a county of residence fishing license. Additionally, possession of this license permits a person who resides in a city that lies in two (2) or more counties to fish in all of the waters of that city, including those waters in the city lying outside of the person's county of legal residence.

Other appropriate license is required:

To fish within one's county of legal residence, for residents who do not qualify for a county of residence fishing license under subsection (a) or who qualify but who choose to purchase any other appropriate license;

To fish outside one's county of legal residence unless such person qualifies under the exception contained in subsection (a);

If minnows or artificial lures are used;

If one fishes in a state lake or state-owned or operated wildlife management area; or

To fish for or take trout.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 15; 1953, ch. 255, § 2 (Williams, §§ 5178.44, 5178.45); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-206; Acts 1989, ch. 486, § 7; 1990, ch. 981, § 4; 1996, ch. 824, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-2-204. Hunting and fishing on farmland — License exemption to owners, tenants, and specified spouses and relatives — Proof of compliance.

The owners and tenants of farmlands, and their spouses and children, have the right to engage in the sport of hunting and fishing, subject to all laws or regulations concerning wildlife, upon such lands and waters on the land of which they or their spouses or parents are the bona fide owners or tenants, with the permission of the landowner, during the season when it is lawful to do so, without procuring a hunting and sport fishing license.

The grandchildren and great-grandchildren under sixteen (16) years of age of the owners of farmlands have the right to engage in the sport of hunting and fishing, subject to all laws or regulations concerning wildlife, upon such lands and waters on the land of which their grandparent or great-grandparent or grandparents or great-grandparents are the bona fide owners, with the permission of the landowner, during the season when it is lawful to do so, without procuring a hunting and sport fishing license.

The spouses of the children of the owners of farmlands have the right to engage in the sport of hunting and fishing, subject to all laws or regulations concerning wildlife, upon such lands and waters on the land of which their mother-in-law or father-in-law is the bona fide owner, with the permission of the landowner, during the season when it is lawful to do so, without procuring a hunting and sport fishing license.

Tenants and their spouses and their dependent children must be bona fide residents of this state and must actually reside on the land.

Owners and their spouses, children, spouses of children, qualified grandchildren, and qualified great-grandchildren must be bona fide residents of this state.

Land may qualify as farmland only if it is owned by no more than one (1) individual or a family; provided, that, if land is owned jointly or in common by persons who are first cousins related by blood, then such cousins and their children may hunt small game and fish on such land under this subsection (a).

“Family” means any combination of kinship within the third degree, including any spouse who has an interest in the property.

“Tenant” means an individual who receives compensation, such as free rent or money, for acting either in the place of or at the direction of the landowner in tending to the requirements needed to care for the farmland. The primary purpose of the tenancy shall be agricultural in nature.

Each person claiming a license exemption under subsection (a) shall provide identification and shall submit a signed statement attesting to the exempt status described in the statement and a description of the land and the name of the land owner when requested by an officer of the wildlife agency or upon presenting any game to a check station. Such statement shall contain information sufficient to demonstrate that such person has complied with the requirements of subsection (a). The commission shall prepare a preprinted form for the submission of such statements for convenience of use. Submission of false information in a signed statement is a Class C misdemeanor.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 16; 1953, ch. 255, § 2 (Williams, § 5178.45); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-207; Acts 1990, ch. 981, § 4; 1993, ch. 310, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 746, § 1; 2000, ch. 837, § 7; 2001, ch. 75, § 1; 2005, ch. 341, § 1; 2020, ch. 746, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the former first sentence of (a)(1), redesignated as present (a)(1)(A) and (B), which read: “The owners and tenants of farmlands, and their spouses and children, along with the owners' grandchildren and great-grandchildren under the age of sixteen (16), have the right to engage in the sport of hunting and fishing, subject to all laws or regulations concerning wildlife, upon such lands and waters on the land of which they or their spouses or parents are the bona fide owners or tenants, or in the case of qualified grandchildren or qualified great-grandchildren, their grandparent or great-grandparent or grandparents or great-grandparents are the bona fide owners, with the permission of the landowner, during the season when it is lawful to do so, without procuring a hunting and sport fishing license.”; added (a)(1)(C); redesignated the former second, third, and fourth sentences of (a)(1) as present (a)(1)(D)-(F); in present (a)(1)(D) and (E), substituted “this state” for “the state”; and inserted “, spouses of children,” in present (a)(1)(E).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 746, § 2. October 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority for hunting license exemptions, OAG 99-002, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (1/19/99).

70-2-205. Commercial fishing and musseling. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Any person, firm or corporation, before engaging in the business of a commercial fisher or commercial musseler, as defined under subsection (b), shall have in possession the requisite license prescribed in this section.

A “commercial fisher” is any person who takes or who aids and assists another person in taking fish or other aquatic life from any of the waters, lakes, streams or ponds of this state for pay, or for the purpose of sale, barter or exchange. Any person fishing with commercial fishing gear shall be deemed to be a commercial fisher within the meaning of this subdivision (b)(1). All persons using fishing tackle or fishing gear other than that permitted to be used by a person having or holding a sport fishing license is likewise deemed and considered a commercial fisher within the meaning of this subdivision (b)(1).

A “commercial musseler” is any person who takes mussels from any of the waters of this state for pay, or for the purpose of sale, barter or exchange.

“Person” includes the plural as well as the singular, as the case demands, and includes individuals, partnerships, associations or corporations.

The license and fees to be paid for a commercial license are as follows:

RESIDENT NONRESIDENT

To take fish only $125.00 $500.00

To take mussels only 125.00 750.00

A commercial helper's license may be issued without limit as to numbers to any commercial fisher upon paying for each license the appropriate fee required for a commercial fisher. A “commercial helper” is any person who assists a commercial fisher in handling fishing gear, operation of motors or any other act of assistance to the commercial fisher while in the vessel with the commercial fisher. Each commercial fisher must have in personal possession a commercial helper's license for each helper on board the vessel at any time.

Any violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and if on second offense, and in the discretion of the court, the deprivation or prohibition of the offender from obtaining a license for a period of six (6) months. Any nonresident convicted of violation of this section shall be prohibited from engaging in commercial fishing or mussel taking in Tennessee for a period of five (5) years from the date of conviction, in addition to any other penalties prescribed by law.

In addition to the fines prescribed in this subsection (e), any person found guilty of engaging in business as defined in subsection (b) without the necessary licenses shall be sentenced to thirty (30) days in the county jail or workhouse, which sentence may be suspended if such person shall show to the court that such person has subsequently purchased the appropriate licenses.

This section does not apply to a resident of Tennessee who is seventy (70) or more years of age, and such person is not required to purchase any license required by this section in order to carry on the businesses enumerated in subsection (b).

Nonresidents residing in states that do not permit the sale of nonresident licenses to residents of Tennessee are prohibited from engaging in the business of a “commercial fisher” or “commercial musseler” in Tennessee.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 11; 1953, ch. 26, § 1 (Williams, § 5178.40); Acts 1955, ch. 225, § 1; 1957, ch. 323, § 1; 1957, ch. 382, § 1; 1965, ch. 323, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1975, ch. 241, § 3; 1979, ch. 409, § 1; 1980, ch. 565, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-211; Acts 1983, ch. 385, § 1; 1989, ch. 486, § 8; 1990, ch. 891, § 8; 1994, ch. 727, § 5; 2000, ch. 905, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. The definition of “commercial fisher” does not encompass fishing guides, charter boat operators, tournament fishermen or others not directly engaged in the business of taking fish for sale, barter or exchange, OAG 07-144, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 144 (10/12/07).

70-2-206. Wholesale fish and mussel dealers — Definitions — License requirements — Fees. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Before any person, firm or corporation engages in the business of a wholesale fish dealer or a wholesale mussel dealer, as defined in this subsection (a), such person, firm or corporation shall possess the appropriate license.

“Person” includes the plural as well as the singular, as the case demands, and includes individuals, partnerships, associations, or corporations;

“Places of business,” as used in this title, includes the place where orders for aquatic products are received, or where aquatic products are purchased or sold;

“Wholesale fish dealer” means any person in the business of buying from a commercial fisher, fish or other edible aquatic life, or parts of fish or other edible aquatic life, or products taken from the waters of this state for the purpose of canning, preserving or processing; or any person in the business of buying from a wholesale fish dealer for the purpose of selling or handling for shipment or sale. Excluded from this definition are restaurants, hotels, grocery stores, retail fish markets, and other businesses that do not buy directly from a commercial fisher and that sell directly to the general public. Each separate place of business shall require a separate license; and

“Wholesale mussel dealer” means any person who buys freshwater mussels or parts of mussels for the purpose of selling, processing or handling for shipment, to wholesalers, retailers or consumers.

The license and fee to be paid are as follows:

Wholesale fish dealer's license $250.00

Wholesale mussel dealer's license 250.00

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 14; 1941, ch. 127, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.22 (Williams, § 5176.14b); Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 27; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1982, ch. 700, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-213; Acts 1989, ch. 486, § 9; 1990, ch. 891, § 9; 2000, ch. 644, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Cross-References. Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

70-2-207. [Reserved.]

A fur dealer is any person who, either directly or through another person, engages in the business of buying and selling the pelts or hides of fur-bearing mammals from hunters, trappers, or other fur dealers.

The license fee for a resident or a nonresident fur dealer shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person, before engaging in the business of buying and selling the pelts or hides of fur-bearing mammals, shall possess the appropriate dealer's license; provided, that a furrier may engage in the business of buying and selling the pelts or hides of fur bearing mammals without possessing or being required to possess a fur dealer's license. Such pelts or hides may be purchased by the furrier from fur dealers.

Each dealer must file with the agency, periodically, as directed by the executive director, a complete report, on forms provided by the agency, of the activity of the previous reporting period. The report must be completed in its entirety and the dealer must, by signature, certify as to its accuracy.

The commission is authorized to adopt rules and regulations governing the tagging of all pelts or hides of fur-bearing mammals taken.

Each dealer must permit wildlife officers to inspect the inventory of pelts or hides and any records.

Any person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor. Upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense within a twelve-month period, the person's license shall be revoked for a period of one (1) year. In addition, any person found guilty of engaging in business as defined in subsection (a) without the necessary licenses shall be sentenced to the county jail or workhouse, which sentence may be suspended if such person shall show to the court that the appropriate licenses have been subsequently purchased.

When used in this section, “person” includes any resident or nonresident individual, association, partnership, corporation or other legal entity including any individual or entity operating in any capacity on behalf of such individual, association, partnership, corporation or other legal entity.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 50 (Williams, § 5178.79); Acts 1981, ch. 362, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-216; Acts 1983, ch. 385, § 2; 1984, ch. 792, §§ 1-3; 1989, ch. 486, § 11; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 891, §§ 10, 11; 1993, ch. 129, § 1; 1999, ch. 258, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Possession and traffic in hides without license unlawful, § 70-2-209.

70-2-209. Unlicensed possession and traffic in hides or pelts— Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to purchase, receive for sale or have in its possession for commercial purposes any green hides, raw furs or pelts of wild animals without first procuring a license, except as provided in § 70-2-208.

Any violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 49 (Williams, § 5178.78); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-219; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 129, § 2.

Cross-References. Licensing of fur dealers, § 70-2-208.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-2-210, 70-2-211.
[Reserved.]

Stocking of wildlife is declared to be a prerogative of the state. All persons desiring to stock wildlife shall first obtain a permit from the executive director. Such a permit will be issued free of charge. Applications for fish from the United States fish and wildlife service, when approved by the wildlife resources agency, shall be considered a sufficient permit for the purpose of this section.

The wildlife resources agency has the power to inspect all live fish entering the state, regardless of their source, and to destroy any shipment found to be diseased, without incurring any liabilities for so doing.

The agency is authorized to impose reasonable charges to defray expenses for stocking fish in private ponds. The charges may reflect the agency's costs for raising and transporting the fish together with other associated costs.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 22 (Williams, § 5178.51); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1982, ch. 738, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-223; Acts 2000, ch. 837, § 6.

70-2-213. Permits for scientific purposes — Reports required — Penalty for violation.

The executive director has the power, at the executive director's discretion, to grant permission, under the executive director's seal, to any reliable person to take, capture and transport in Tennessee, wild birds, and nests and eggs of wild birds, and wild animals and fish, when taken and used for purely scientific purposes. The permit so issued shall continue in force for one (1) year after the date of issue and shall specify the number of any species to be taken under the permit.

Each person receiving a permit under this section shall report to the wildlife resources agency on blanks furnished by it, at or before the expiration of such permit, the number and disposition of the collections made under the permit.

Any person taking any wildlife in violation of this section, or of the permit held by that person, shall be, upon conviction, fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) and the permit held by that person shall become void.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 66 (Williams, § 5178.95); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-224.

70-2-214. Training of hunting dogs — License requirements — Regulation of field trials — Penalty for violations.

Any resident or nonresident who trains hunting dogs in this state shall purchase the appropriate hunting license, except when such person is competing in recognized field trials.

Raccoon dog field trials, retriever dog field trials, bird dog field trials, rabbit dog field trials, and foxhound field trials will be permitted only under rules and regulations promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission. The fish and wildlife commission is authorized to make all such rules or regulations, or both, in connection with the field trials as it may deem necessary to carry out this section.

Any violation of this section, or any violation of any rule or regulation promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission pursuant to this section, is a Class C misdemeanor and, upon conviction of the violation, shall be punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 14; 1953, ch. 249, § 1; 1953, ch. 255, § 2 (Williams, §§ 5178.43, 5178.45); 1961, ch. 195, § 1; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-225; Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Hunting dogs, training of using tamed quail, authorized with permit, § 70-4-120.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure (Robert E. Kendrick), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1220.

70-2-215. Taxidermist permits — Report of work — Penalty for violation. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Any person, before engaging in the practice of taxidermy, which includes the stuffing, mounting, and preparing of the skins of wild birds, animals, and fish for sale or for hire, must first obtain a permit to do so from the executive director.

The executive director shall collect a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each permit issued, each permit to expire the last day of February.

Each person obtaining such a permit shall conduct such practice of taxidermy in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. Failure to make a report pursuant to the rules and regulations shall bar the person concerned from receiving a renewal of the person's permit or a new permit to engage in taxidermy.

Any person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 67 (Williams, § 5178.96); 1961, ch. 198, § 1; 1969, ch. 245, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1975, ch. 241, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-226; Acts 1989, ch. 486, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Sales and use tax exemption for taxidermists, § 67-6-333.

70-2-216 — 70-2-218. [Reserved.]

Fees for permits required by rules and regulations or proclamations proclaimed by the fish and wildlife commission, or both, are as follows:

Type Permit Daily Annual Hunting: Small game — except waterfowl $ 10.00 Combination waterfowl and small game $ 5.00 25.00 Reelfoot waterfowl blind 50.00 Big Game: (1) Nonquota 12.00 (2) Quota 10.00 per hunt (3) Cherokee Wildlife Management Area — Big game nonquota 9.00 Field trial — Wildlife Management Area 50.00 per trial Fishing: Agency lakes 3.00 30.00 Agency lakes — Boat rental 5.00 Tellico-Citico trout 3.00 Reelfoot Preservation 2.00 10.00 Reelfoot Preservation three-day 6.00 (total for 3-day permit)

Click to view table.

Before any person may fish for trout in a premiere tourist resort city, such person must obtain the appropriate permit as described in this part, in addition to any appropriate state license, if required. The fish and wildlife commission is authorized to establish seasons and creel limits and to establish and collect permit fees in amounts to be set forth by proclamation duly passed by the commission. In addition to the appropriate state license, a person must obtain either a one-day permit for a fee of two dollars ($2.00) or a three-day permit for a fee of six dollars ($6.00); provided, that a nonresident may purchase a one-day all inclusive permit, in lieu of the normal license/permit combination. The fee for this permit shall be not less than eight dollars ($8.00) nor greater than thirteen dollars ($13.00). Eight dollars ($8.00) from each permit sold shall be retained by the agency as its license fee.

The fish and wildlife commission is authorized to pay to the premiere tourist resort city an amount not to exceed the permit fees collected, less the eight-dollar license fee retained by the agency, for the cost incurred by the premiere tourist resort city for the stocking of trout.

The fish and wildlife commission may exempt certain age groups from this section.

Full-time police officers and other such authorized employees of the premiere tourist resort city have the authority under the guidance of the fish and wildlife commission to enforce the creel limits, licensing and permit requirements of this subsection (b).

“Premiere tourist resort city” means a municipality having a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or more persons, according to the federal census of 1980 or any subsequent federal census, in which at least forty percent (40%) of the assessed valuation, as shown by the tax assessment rolls or books of the municipality, of the real estate in the municipality consists of hotels, motels, tourist courts accommodation, tourist shops and restaurants.

All funds derived from the sale of the Reelfoot preservation permit are hereby designated as set aside for the exclusive use of acquiring and maintaining lands around Reelfoot Lake.

Residents of Tennessee sixty-five (65) years of age or older who purchase an annual senior citizen permit and who otherwise comply with the licensing requirements of § 70-2-201(c)(2), if applicable, enjoy the same additional privileges and benefits as provided to an annual sportsman license holder. The annual fee shall be forty dollars ($40.00).

The executive director is authorized to issue special permits to a nonprofit wildlife conservation organization that qualifies as tax exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)). An organization that receives a special permit issued under this subsection (e) may sell or otherwise transfer such permits through any legal means available.

Any proceeds of the sale must be used in this state for wildlife management projects approved by the agency; provided, that, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the organization may use no more than twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds to administer the sale or transfer of the permit.

The executive director may issue up to five (5) special permits in a license year and shall strive to ensure that hunting or fishing opportunities occur in each grand division of the state pursuant to this subsection (e).

The commission may promulgate rules to implement the special permit program.

Acts 1978, ch. 638, § 1; 1979, ch. 231, § 1; 1981, ch. 112, § 1; 1981, ch. 484, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 51-238; Acts 1983, ch. 285, § 1; 1985, ch. 350, §§ 6, 7; 1987, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 47, § 1; 1989, ch. 486, §§ 13, 14; 1991, ch. 124, § 1; 1992, ch. 570, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 616, § 2; 1995, ch. 332, § 1; 1999, ch. 107, § 1; 2001, ch. 376, § 3; 2007, ch. 162, § 1; 2009, ch. 182, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13; 2019, ch. 65, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (e), deleted the former second and third sentences which read: “Only one (1) permit may be issued within a license year. The special elk-take permit shall be issued using competitive guidelines promulgated by the commission.”; redesignated the former first and fourth sentences as present (e)(1) substituting “issue special permits” for “issue a special elk take permit” in the first sentence, and substituting “special permit” for “special elk take permit” and “such permits” for “the permit” in the last sentence”; redesignated the former fifth sentence as present (e)(2) substituting “sale must be used in this state for wildlife management projects” for “shall be used in this state for the elk program on projects”; added (e)(3); and redesignated the former last sentence as present (e)(4) substituting “may promulgate rules to implement the special permit” for “is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the special elk take permit”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 65, § 2. March 28, 2019.

Cross-References. Resident license fees and requirements, § 70-2-201.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

70-2-220. Permits for pearl culturing. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Any person, firm or corporation, before engaging in the business of culturing pearls in the public waters, shall first obtain an annual license from the wildlife resources agency. No nonresident shall be granted a license if the state or country of the nonresident prohibits residents of Tennessee from engaging in the business of culturing pearls. The fee for the license shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000). The business shall be conducted in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission. The executive director of the wildlife resources agency shall select a committee of five (5) people that will include the executive director or the executive director's representative, the chief of fisheries, a fisheries biologist, and two (2) industry representatives to assist the executive director in the initial drafting of these rules and regulations.

Acts 1986, ch. 653, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.